pt-PT: Tipo de corrente do pedal da bateria: Corrente tipo bicicleta; Corrente de elos; Corrente de rolos; Corrente silenciosa; Outro
ja: ドラムペダルチェーンタイプ: 自転車型チェーン; リンクチェーン; ローラーチェーン; サイレントチェーン; その他
sv: Typ av kedja för trumpedal: Cykelkedja; Länkkedja; Rullkedja; Tyst kedja; Övrigt
fr: Pédale de batterie à chaîne: Chaîne style vélo; Chaîne à maillons; Chaîne à rouleaux; Chaîne silencieuse; Autre
bg-BG: Тип верига за педал на барабан: Верига тип велосипедна; Звенова верига; Ролкова верига; Безшумна верига; Друго
sk-SK: Typ reťaze bubeníckej šľapky: Cyklistická reťaz; Článková reťaz; Valčeková reťaz; Tichá reťaz; Iné
it: Tipo di catena del pedale del tamburo: Catena in stile bicicletta; Catena a maglie; Catena a rulli; Catena silenziosa; Altro
th: ประเภทโซ่ของกระเดื่องกลอง: โซ่สไตล์จักรยาน; โซ่แบบข้อต่อ; โซ่แบบลูกกลิ้ง; โซ่แบบเงียบ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Būgno pedalo grandinės tipas: Dviračio stiliaus grandinė; Narelinė grandinė; Ritininė grandinė; Tylioji grandinė; Kita
pl: Typ łańcucha stopy perkusyjnej: Łańcuch rowerowy; Łańcuch ogniwowy; Łańcuch rolkowy; Łańcuch bezgłośny; Inny
ru: Тип цепи педали барабана: Велосипедная цепь; Звеньевая цепь; Роликовая цепь; Бесшумная (зубчатая) цепь; Другое
fi: Rumpupedaalin ketjun tyyppi: Polkupyörätyylinen ketju; Lenkkiketju; Rullaketju; Äänetön ketju; Muu
nb: Kjedetype for trommepedal: Sykkelkjede-stil; Leddkjede; Rullekjede; Lydløs kjede; Annet
vi: Loại xích của bàn đạp trống: Xích kiểu xe đạp; Xích mắt xích; Xích con lăn; Xích giảm ồn; Khác
zh-CN: 鼓踏板链条类型: 自行车链条; 环式链条; 滚子链条; 静音链条; 其他
hu: Dobpedál lánctípusa: Kerékpárlánc stílusú; Szemes lánc; Görgős lánc; Csendes lánc; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta verige pedala za boben: Kolesarska veriga; Členkasta veriga; Valjčna veriga; Tiha veriga; Drugo
es: Tipo de cadena de pedal de batería: Cadena estilo bicicleta; Cadena de eslabones; Cadena de rodillos; Cadena silenciosa; Otro
ko: 드럼 페달 체인 유형: 자전거 스타일 체인; 링크 체인; 롤러 체인; 사일런트 체인; 기타
en: Drum pedal chain type: Bicycle-style chain; Linked chain; Roller chain; Silent chain; Other
zh-TW: 鼓踏板鏈條類型: 自行車式鏈條; 環扣鏈條; 滾子鏈條; 靜音鏈條; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de corrente do pedal de tambor de bateria: Corrente estilo bicicleta; Corrente articulada; Corrente de roletes; Corrente silenciosa; Outra
ro-RO: Tipul lanțului pedalei de tobă: Lanț tip bicicletă; Lanț cu zale; Lanț cu role; Lanț silențios; Altele
tr: Davul pedalı zincir tipi: Bisiklet tipi zincir; Baklalı zincir; Makaralı zincir; Sessiz zincir; Diğer
de: Typ der Fußmaschinenkette: Fahrradkette; Gliederkette; Rollenkette; Geräuscharme Kette; Sonstige
cs: Řetězový typ pedálu bicích: Řetěz cyklistického typu; Článkový řetěz; Válečkový řetěz; Tichý řetěz; Ostatní
da: Trommepedalkædetype: Cykelkæde; Lænket kæde; Rullekæde; Lydløs kæde; Anden
nl: Type ketting drumpedaal: Fietsketting-stijl; Schakelketting; Rollenketting; Stille ketting; Anders
hr-HR: Vrsta lanca pedale bubnja: Lanac u stilu bicikla; Lanac s karikama; Valjkasti lanac; Tihi lanac; Ostalo
el: Τύπος αλυσίδας πεντάλ τυμπάνου: Αλυσίδα στυλ ποδηλάτου; Αλυσίδα με κρίκους; Αλυσίδα με κυλίνδρους; Αθόρυβη αλυσίδα; Άλλο